District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.23

Resignation and removal of officers.

(a)

The board of directors may remove an officer at any time with or without cause.

(b)

An officer of a limited cooperative association may resign at any time by giving notice in a record to the association. Unless the notice specifies a later time, the resignation shall be effective when the notice is given.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 823 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition